Utah statutes.
57-12-5.   Reimbursement of owner for expenses.

Any agency acquiring real property for its use shall as soon as practicable after the date of payment of the purchase price or the date of deposit into court of funds to satisfy the award of compensation in a condemnation proceeding to acquire real property, whichever is the earlier, reimburse the owner for expenses the owner necessarily incurred for:

(1)  recording fees, transfer taxes, and similar expenses incidental to conveying the real property to the agency;

(2)  penalty costs for prepayment for any preexisting recorded mortgage entered into in good faith encumbering the real property;

(3)  the pro rata portion of real property taxes paid which are allocable to a period subsequent to the date of vesting title in the agency, or the effective date of possession of such real property by the agency, whichever is the earlier; and

(4)  relocation costs.



Amended by Chapter 321, 1998 General Session

